Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2950
Records or reports; requirements.

Any person subject to the Animal Health and Disease Control Act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under the act shall keep records or reports pertaining to vaccination of animals, herds, or flocks, official diagnostic test results, and movement of affected animals, herds, or flocks infected with, exposed to, or suspected of being infected with or exposed to a program disease for five years. Such person shall keep any other records or make any other reports the department deems necessary to enforce the act.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 50.